Utah statutes.
19-8-117.   Program report and budget allocations -- Fee schedule.

(1) (a)  For applications submitted on or after May 5, 1997 through June 30, 1998, the application fee under this chapter is $2,000.

(b)  Regarding applications submitted on and after July 1, 1998, the executive director shall annually calculate the costs to administer the voluntary cleanup program under this chapter and shall establish the fees for the program under Section 63J-1-504.

(2)  All fees under Subsection (1) shall be deposited in the account created under Section 19-8-103.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

